Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 3. Grievances; Dismissal, etc., of Teachers.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 13.

§ 22.1-306.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Business day”
means any day that the relevant school board office is open.

“Day”
means calendar days unless a different meaning is clearly expressed in this article. Whenever the last day for performing an act required by this article falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the act may be performed on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

“Dismissal”
means the dismissal of any teacher during the term of such teacher’s contract.

“Grievance”
means a complaint or dispute by a teacher relating to his employment, including (i) disciplinary action including dismissal; (ii) the application or interpretation of (a) personnel policies, (b) procedures, (c) rules and regulations, (d) ordinances, and (e) statutes; (iii) acts of reprisal against a teacher for filing or processing a grievance, participating as a witness in any step, meeting, or hearing relating to a grievance, or serving as a member of a fact-finding panel; and (iv) complaints of discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, political affiliation, disability, age, national origin, sex, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or military status. Each school board shall have the exclusive right to manage the affairs and operations of the school division. Accordingly, the term “grievance” shall not include a complaint or dispute by a teacher relating to (a) establishment and revision of wages or salaries, position classifications, or general benefits; (b) suspension of a teacher or nonrenewal of the contract of a teacher who has not achieved continuing contract status; (c) the establishment or contents of ordinances, statutes, or personnel policies, procedures, rules, and regulations; (d) failure to promote; (e) discharge, layoff, or suspension from duties because of decrease in enrollment, decrease in enrollment or abolition of a particular subject, or insufficient funding; (f) hiring, transfer, assignment, and retention of teachers within the school division; (g) suspension from duties in emergencies; (h) the methods, means, and personnel by which the school division’s operations are to be carried on; or (i) coaching or extracurricular activity sponsorship.

While these management rights are reserved to the school board, failure to apply, where applicable, the rules, regulations, policies, or procedures as written or established by the school board is grievable.

“Military status”
means status as (i) a member of the uniformed forces, as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101(a)(5), of the United States or a reserve component thereof named under 10 U.S.C. § 10101, (ii) a veteran as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(2), or (iii) a dependent as defined in 50 U.S.C. § 3911(4) except that the support provided by the service member to the individual shall have been provided 180 days immediately preceding an alleged action that if proven true would constitute unlawful discrimination under this section instead of 180 days immediately preceding an application for relief under 50 U.S.C. Chapter 50.

“Religion”
includes any outward expression of religious faith, including adherence to religious dressing and grooming practices and the carrying or display of religious items or symbols.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.5:1; 1979, c. 298; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 646; 1992, c. 679; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2020, cc. 1137, 1140; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477, 478; 2022, c. 799.

Cross references.

As to terms of employment of personnel for the Virginia Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, see § 22.1-349.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and added definitions of “Business day” and “Day”; relocated the definition of “Dismissal” and deleted “and the nonrenewal of the contract of a teacher on continuing contract” at the end; in the definition of “Grievance” deleted “or placing on probation” at the end of clause (i) in the first sentence, redesignated clauses (i) through (viii) as clauses (1) through (8), added clause (9), and made a related change.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137, in the definition for “Grievance,” substituted “disability, age, national origin, or sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity” for “handicap, age, national origin or sex” in clause (iv) of the first sentence, and made stylistic changes. The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1140, in the definition for “Grievance,” deleted “but not necessarily limited to” following “including” in the introductory language of the first sentence and substituted “race, color, creed, religion, political affiliation, disability, age, national origin, sex, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or status as a veteran” for “race, color, creed, political affiliation, handicap, age, national origin, or sex” in clause (iv) of the first sentence, and made stylistic changes

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 477 and 478, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added “unless the context requires a different meaning” in the introductory language; in the definition for “grievance,” substituted “military status” for “status as a veteran” in clause (iv) of the first sentence, and redesignated clauses (1) through (9) as clauses (a) through (i) in the third sentence; and added the definition for “Military status.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 799 added the definition of “Religion” at the end.

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

For survey of Virginia law on employment law for the year 1991, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 759 (1991).

§ 22.1-307.
Dismissal of teacher; grounds.

Teachers may be dismissed for incompetency, immorality, noncompliance with school laws and regulations, disability as shown by competent medical evidence when in compliance with federal law, conviction of a felony or a crime of moral turpitude, or other good and just cause. A teacher shall be dismissed if such teacher is or becomes the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse and neglect, pursuant to §

63.2-1505

, and after all rights to any administrative appeal provided by §

63.2-1526

have been exhausted. The fact of such finding, after all rights to any administrative appeal provided by §

63.2-1526

have been exhausted, shall be grounds for the local school division to recommend that the Board of Education revoke such person’s license to teach. No teacher shall be dismissed or placed on probation solely on the basis of the teacher’s refusal to submit to a polygraph examination requested by the school board.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.5; 1968, c. 691; 1975, c. 308; 1980, c. 559; 1993, c. 498; 1996, c. 961; 2008, c. 555; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2017, c. 240; 2020, cc. 56, 168.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 833 and 843, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of § 22.1-296.1 of the Code of Virginia and consistent with the discretion granted to a school board pursuant to § 22.1-307 of the Code of Virginia to retain an employee who is convicted of an offense subsequent to the employee’s hiring, a school board may employ an individual who, at the time of the individual’s hiring, has been convicted of a felony, provided that such individual (i) was employed in good standing by a school board on or before December 17, 2015; (ii) has been granted a simple pardon for such offense by the Governor or other appropriate authority; and (iii) has had his civil rights restored by the Governor or other appropriate authority. However, a school board may employ, until July 1, 2020, such an individual who does not satisfy the conditions set forth in clauses (ii) and (iii), provided that such individual has been continuously employed by the school board from December 17, 2015, through July 1, 2018.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 555 inserted the second and third sentences in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and deleted “or placed on probation” following “dismissed” near the beginning of subsection A; and substituted “one or more unsatisfactory performance evaluations” for “performance that is documented through evaluation to be consistently less than satisfactory” at the end of subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 240 substituted “any administrative appeal” for “an appeal” in twice in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 56 and 168 are identical, and deleted subsection B which read: “For the purposes of this article, ‘incompetency’ may be construed to include, but shall not be limited to, consistent failure to meet the endorsement requirements for the position or one or more unsatisfactory performance evaluations.”

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

§ 22.1-308.
Grievance procedure.

The Board of Education shall prescribe a grievance procedure which shall include the following:

Except in the case of dismissal or placing on probation, a first step which shall provide for an informal, initial processing of a grievance by the most immediate appropriate supervisor through a discussion;

A requirement that all stages of the grievance beyond the first step be in writing on forms prescribed by the Board of Education and supplied by the school board;

A requirement that in reducing the grievance to writing, the teacher shall specify the specific relief sought through the use of the procedure;

The right of the grievant and the respondent to present appropriate witnesses and be represented by legal counsel and another representative;

Reasonable time limitations, prescribed by the Board, for the grievant to submit an initial complaint and to appeal each decision through the steps of the grievance procedure which shall correspond generally or be equivalent to the time prescribed for response at each step;

Termination of the right of the grievant to further appeal upon failure of the grievant to comply with all substantial procedural requirements of the grievance procedure without just cause;

The right of the grievant, at his option, upon failure of the respondent to comply with all substantial procedural requirements without just cause, to advancement to the next step or, in the final step, to a decision in his favor;

A final step which shall provide for a final decision on the grievance by the school board;

The provisions of §§ 22.1-309 through 22.1-313.

Representatives referred to in subsection A 4 of this section may examine, cross-examine, question and present evidence on behalf of a grievant or respondent in the grievance procedure without being in violation of the provisions of §

54.1-3904

.

Nothing in the procedure shall be construed to restrict any teacher’s right to seek or a school division administration’s right to provide customary review of complaints that are not included within the definition of a grievance.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.5:2; 1979, c. 298; 1980, c. 559; 1992, c. 679.

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

§ 22.1-309.
Notice to teacher of recommendation of dismissal; school board not to consider merits during notice; superintendent required to provide reasons for recommendation upon request.

In the event a division superintendent determines to recommend dismissal of any teacher, written notice shall be sent to the teacher notifying him of the proposed dismissal and informing him that within 10 business days after receiving the notice the teacher may request a hearing before the school board or, at the option of the local school board, a hearing officer appointed by the school board as provided in § 22.1-311. During such 10-business-day period and thereafter until a hearing is held in accordance with the provisions of this section, if one is requested by the teacher, the merits of the recommendation of the division superintendent shall not be considered, discussed or acted upon by the school board except as provided for in this section. At the request of the teacher, the division superintendent shall provide the reasons for the recommendation in writing or, if the teacher prefers, in a personal interview. In the event a teacher requests a hearing pursuant to § 22.1-311, the division superintendent shall provide, within 10 days of the request, the teacher or his representative with the opportunity to inspect and copy his personnel file and all other documents relied upon in reaching the decision to recommend dismissal. Within 10 days of the request of the division superintendent, the teacher or his representative shall provide the division superintendent with the opportunity to inspect and copy the documents to be offered in rebuttal to the decision to recommend dismissal. The division superintendent and the teacher or his representative shall be under a continuing duty to disclose and produce any additional documents identified later which may be used in the respective parties’ cases-in-chief. The cost of copying such documents shall be paid by the requesting party.

For the purposes of this section, “personnel file” means any and all memoranda, entries, or other documents included in the teacher’s file as maintained in the central school administration office or in any file on the teacher maintained within a school in which the teacher serves.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.6; 1968, c. 691; 1975, c. 308; 1979, c. 298; 1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 441; 1992, c. 679; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2014, cc. 13, 103.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and in the first sentence, deleted “or the placing on probation of a teacher on continuing contract” following “teacher,” deleted “or placing on probation” following “proposed dismissal,” substituted “five business days” for “fifteen days,” inserted “or, at the option of the local school board, a hearing officer appointed by the school board,” and deleted “or before a fact-finding panel as provided in § 22.1-312” at the end; substituted “five business day” for “fifteen-day” in the second sentence; in the third sentence, deleted “or § 22.1-312” following “§ 22.1-311,” and “or probation” at the end; deleted “or probation” at the end of the fourth sentence; and made stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 13 and 103 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “10” for “five” in the first sentence and substituted “10-business-day” for “five business day” in the second sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia constitutional law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1397 (1978).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4A M.J. Conflict of Laws, Domicile and Residence, § 6; 16 M.J. Schools, § 20.

§ 22.1-310.
Repealed by Acts 2013, cc. 588 and 650, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-310, pertaining to election of hearing before fact-finding panel prior to decision of school board, derived from Code 1950, § 22-217.6:1; 1979, c. 298; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-311.
Hearing before school board, hearing officer, or fact-finding panel.

Upon a timely request for a hearing pursuant to § 22.1-309, the school board or, at the option of the school board, a hearing officer appointed by the school board or a three-member fact-finding panel shall set a hearing and the teacher shall be given at least 10 days’ written notice of the time and the place. The hearing shall be private unless the teacher requests the hearing to be public. At the hearing the teacher may appear with or without a representative and be heard, presenting testimony of witnesses and other evidence. The school board may hear a recommendation for dismissal and make a determination whether to make a recommendation to the Board of Education regarding the teacher’s license at the same hearing or hold a separate hearing for each action.

Each school board may appoint an impartial hearing officer from outside the school division to conduct hearings pursuant to this section. A hearing officer shall not have been involved in the recommendation of dismissal as a witness or a representative. A hearing officer shall possess some knowledge and expertise in public education and education law and be capable of presiding over an administrative hearing. The hearing officer shall schedule and preside over such hearings and shall create a record or recording of such proceedings. The hearing officer shall make a written recommendation to the school board, a copy of which shall be provided to the teacher. The hearing officer shall transmit the recommendation and the record or recording of the hearing to the school board as soon as practicable and no more than 10 business days after the hearing. In the event of a hearing before a hearing officer, the school board may make its decision upon the record or recording of such hearing, pursuant to § 22.1-313, or the school board may elect to conduct a further hearing to receive additional evidence by giving written notice of the time and place to the teacher and the division superintendent within 10 business days after the board receives the record or recording of the initial hearing. Such notice shall also specify each matter to be inquired into by the school board.

Each school board may elect for a three-member fact-finding panel to conduct hearings pursuant to this section. The teacher and the division superintendent shall each select one panel member, and the two panel members so selected shall select an impartial hearing officer to serve as the chairman of the panel. The fact-finding panel shall schedule and preside over such hearings and shall create a record or recording of such proceedings. The fact-finding panel shall make a written recommendation to the school board, a copy of which shall be provided to the teacher. The fact-finding panel shall transmit the recommendation and the record or recording of the hearing to the school board as soon as practicable but in no case more than 10 business days after the hearing. In the event of a hearing before a fact-finding panel, the school board may make its decision upon the record or recording of such hearing, pursuant to § 22.1-313, or the school board may elect to conduct a further hearing to receive additional evidence by giving written notice of the time and place of the hearing to the teacher and the division superintendent within 10 business days after the board receives the record or recording of the initial hearing. Such notice shall also specify each matter to be inquired into by the school board.

A record or recording of any hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be made. The parties shall share the cost of the recording equally. In proceedings concerning grievances not related to dismissal, the recording may be dispensed with entirely by mutual consent of the parties. In such proceedings, if the recording is not dispensed with, the two parties shall share the cost of the recording equally; if either party requests a transcript, that party shall bear the expense of its preparation. In cases of dismissal, the record or recording shall be preserved for a period of six months. If the school board requests that a transcript be made at any time prior to expiration of the six-month period, it shall be made and copies shall be furnished to both parties. The school board shall bear the cost of the transcription.

Witnesses who are employees of the school board shall be granted release time if the hearing is held during the school day. The hearing shall be held at the school in which most witnesses work, if feasible.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.7; 1968, c. 691; 1976, c. 282; 1980, c. 559; 2004, c. 1007; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2020, c. 875.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1007 substituted “30 days” for “thirty days” and “15 days’ written notice” for “fifteen days’ written notice” and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and rewrote the section, which read: “The hearing before the school board, which shall be private unless the teacher requests a public one, must be set within 30 days of the request, and the teacher must be given at least
15 days’ written notice of the time and place. At the hearing the teacher may appear with or without a representative and be heard, presenting testimony of witnesses and other evidence. The school board may hear a recommendation for dismissal and make a determination whether to make a recommendation to the Board of Education regarding the teacher’s license at the same hearing or hold a separate hearing for each action.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by c. 875, in subsection A, substituted “or a three-member fact-finding panel shall set a hearing and the teacher shall be given at least 10 days’ written notice” for “shall set a hearing within 15 days of the request and the teacher shall be given at least five days’ written notice” in the first sentence; inserted subsection C and redesignated accordingly.

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 20.

§ 22.1-312.
Repealed by Acts 2013, cc. 588 and 650, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-312, pertaining to hearing before fact-finding panel, derived from Code 1950, § 22-217.7:1; 1979, c. 298; 1980, c. 559; 1983, cc. 327, 354; 1984, c. 742; 1988, c. 242; 2000, c. 837; 2003, c. 161; 2004, c. 1007.

§ 22.1-313.
Decision of school board; generally.

The school board shall retain its exclusive final authority over matters concerning employment and supervision of its personnel, including dismissals and suspensions.

In the case of a hearing before the school board, the school board shall give the teacher its written decision as soon as practicable but in no case more than 30 days after the hearing.

In the case of a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the school board or a three-member fact-finding panel, the school board shall give the teacher its written decision as soon as practicable but in no case more than 30 days after receiving the record or recording of the hearing; however, should there be a further hearing before the school board, such decision shall be furnished the teacher as soon as practicable but in no case more than 30 days after such further hearing.

A teacher may be dismissed or suspended by a majority of a quorum of the school board.

The school board’s attorney, assistants, or representative, if he or they represented a participant in the prior proceedings, the grievant, the grievant’s attorney or representative, and notwithstanding the provisions of § 22.1-69, the superintendent shall be excluded from any executive session of the school board which has as its purpose reaching a decision on a grievance. However, immediately after a decision has been made and publicly announced, as in favor of or not in favor of the grievant, the school board’s attorney or representative and the superintendent may join the school board in executive session to assist in the writing of the decision.

In those instances when licensed personnel are dismissed or resign due to a conviction of any felony, any offense involving the sexual molestation, physical or sexual abuse or rape of a child, any offense involving drugs, or due to having become the subject of a founded case of child abuse or neglect, the local school board shall notify the Board of Education within 10 business days of such dismissal or the acceptance of such resignation.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.8; 1968, c. 691; 1974, c. 18; 1979, c. 298; 1980, c. 559; 1983, c. 327; 1992, c. 679; 2003, c. 187; 2008, cc. 474, 827; 2013, cc. 588, 650; 2020, c. 875.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 187 substituted “30” for “thirty” and “10 business days” for “ten days” throughout the section.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 474 and 827 are identical, and added subsection F.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by c. 875 substituted “but in no case more than 30 days” for “and no more than 30 days” wherever it appears; and in subsection C, inserted “or a three-member fact-finding panel.”

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 20.

§ 22.1-314.
Decision of school board; issue of grievability; appeal.

Decisions regarding whether or not a matter is grievable shall be made by the school board at the request of the school division administration or grievant and such decision shall be made within 10 business days of such request. The school board shall reach its decision only after allowing the school division administration and the grievant opportunity to present written or oral arguments regarding grievability. The decision as to whether the arguments shall be written or oral shall be in the discretion of the school board. Decisions of the school board may be appealed to the circuit court having jurisdiction in the school division for a hearing on the issue of grievability.

Proceedings for review of the decision of the school board shall be instituted by filing a notice of appeal with the school board within 10 business days after the date of the decision and giving a copy thereof to all other parties. Within 10 business days thereafter, the school board shall transmit to the clerk of the court to which the appeal is taken a copy of its decision, a copy of the notice of appeal, and the exhibits. The failure of the school board to transmit the record within the time allowed shall not prejudice the rights of the grievant. The court, on motion of the grievant, may issue a writ of certiorari requiring the school board to transmit the record on or before a certain date. Within 10 business days of receipt by the clerk of such record, the court, sitting without a jury, shall hear the appeal on the record transmitted by the school board and such additional evidence as may be necessary to resolve any controversy as to the correctness of the record. The court, in its discretion, may receive such other evidence as the ends of justice require. The court may affirm the decision of the school board or may reverse or modify the decision. The decision of the court shall be rendered no later than the fifteenth day from the date of the conclusion of the hearing. Such determination of grievability shall be made subsequent to the reduction of the grievance to writing but prior to any hearing or the right to such determination shall be deemed to have been waived.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-217.8:01; 1979, c. 298; 1980, c. 559; 1987, c. 97; 2003, c. 187; 2013, cc. 588, 650.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 187 substituted “10 business days” for “ten days” throughout the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and deleted “panel or school board” following “prior to any” in the last sentence of the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 20.